Delaware, session 153, SB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Amend Chapter 18, Title 24 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows and by redesignating accordingly: Â§ 1802. Definitions. The following words, terms, and phrases, when used in this chapter, have the meanings ascribed to them in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning: ( ) âState HVACR Licenseâ means a license given by the Board to an individual to provide heating, ventilation, and air conditioning services in Delaware. ( ) âState Plumbing Licenseâ means a license given by the Board to an individual to provide plumbing services in Delaware . Â§ 1807. License required; exemptions. (d) The State Plumbing License issued by the Board must be recognized by any county, city, and municipality in Delaware without reservations or additional requirements to do work in these jurisdictions. (d) (e) The penalty for a violation of this section is, for a first offense, a fine of not less than $1,500 nor more than $3,000, and, for a second or subsequent offense, a fine of not less than $3,000 nor more than $6,000. The Justice of the Peace Courts Court shall have has jurisdiction over violations of this section. Â§ 1820. License required; exemptions. (d) The State HVACR License issued by the Board must be recognized by any county, city, and municipality in Delaware without reservations or additional requirements to do work in these jurisdictions. (d) (e) The penalty for a violation of this section is, for a first offense, a fine of not less than $1,500 nor more than $3,000, and, for a second or subsequent offense, a fine of not less than $3,000 nor more than $6,000. The Justice of the Peace Courts have Court has jurisdiction over violations of this section.